Alaska, session 34, SB282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 08.01.063(f) is amended to read: 05 (f) The department shall [SUBMIT THE REPORT PREPARED UNDER (e) 06 OF THIS SECTION TO THE JOINT ARMED SERVICES COMMITTEE ON OR 07 BEFORE THE FIRST DAY OF MARCH EACH YEAR. IN ADDITION, THE 08 DEPARTMENT SHALL] consolidate the two most recent reports prepared under 09 (e) of this section and submit a biennial report to the legislature on or before the first 10 day of March during the first regular session of each legislature. The department shall 11 deliver a copy of the biennial report to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the 12 house of representatives and notify the legislature that the report is available. 13 * Sec. 2. AS 24.20.650(b) is amended to read: 14 (b) The committee is composed of 01 (1) five members of the senate, at least two of whom are members 02 [ONE OF WHOM IS A MEMBER] of the minority, appointed by the president of the 03 senate; 04 (2) five members of the house of representatives, at least two of whom 05 are members [ONE OF WHOM IS A MEMBER] of the minority, appointed by the 06 speaker of the house of representatives; 07 (3) a state resident, other than a member of the state legislature, who is 08 appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of 09 representatives after considering the recommendations of the Alaska chapters of each 10 of the following organizations: 11 (A) the Association of the United States Army; 12 (B) the Air and Space Forces Association; 13 (C) the Navy League of the United States; 14 (D) the Marine Corps Association; 15 (4) a state resident, other than a member of the state legislature, who is 16 appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of 17 representatives after considering the recommendation of the Seventeenth Coast Guard 18 District Auxiliary; 19 (5) a state resident, other than a member of the state legislature, who is 20 appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of 21 representatives after considering the recommendation of the mayor of the Municipality 22 of Anchorage; 23 (6) a state resident, other than a member of the state legislature, who is 24 appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of 25 representatives after considering the recommendation of the mayor of the Fairbanks 26 North Star Borough; 27 (7) a state resident, other than a member of the state legislature, who is 28 appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of 29 representatives after considering the recommendation of the adjutant general of the 30 Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs; [AND] 31 (8) a state resident, other than a member of the state legislature, who is 01 appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of 02 representatives after considering the recommendation [JOINT 03 RECOMMENDATIONS] of the Alaska Federation of Natives; and 04 (9) a state resident, other than a member of the state legislature, 05 who is appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the 06 house of representatives after considering the recommendation of the Alaska 07 Municipal League. 08 * Sec. 3. AS 24.20.665(a) is amended to read: 09 (a) Nine [EIGHT] members of the Joint Armed Services Committee constitute 10 a quorum. 11 * Sec. 4. AS 24.20.665 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 12 (d) The committee shall hold at least one meeting each calendar year at which 13 senior military representatives in the state are invited to brief the committee on 14 military matters in the state. 15 * Sec. 5. AS 24.20.670 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 16 (b) The Legislative Affairs Agency shall 17 (1) maintain a list of members and each member's contact information; 18 (2) notify the presiding officers of the house and senate of vacancies 19 and upcoming vacancies of civilian members; and 20 (3) maintain a list of previous recipients awarded the Alaska 21 Decoration of Honor by the legislature and a list of members of the armed services 22 who are eligible to receive the Alaska Decoration of Honor. 23 * Sec. 6. AS 24.20.675(a) is amended to read: 24 (a) The Joint Armed Services Committee shall 25 (1) monitor the military base realignment and closure activities of the 26 federal government for bases in the state; 27 (2) [WORK ON SPECIFIC REALIGNMENTS AND CLOSURES 28 PROPOSED BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR BASES IN THE STATE; 29 (3)] work with the state's congressional delegation, other state and 30 local government organizations, and community groups on military and defense 31 issues; 01 (3) [REGARDING FEDERAL MILITARY BASE REALIGNMENTS 02 AND CLOSINGS IN THE STATE; 03 (4) ATTEND MEETINGS AND HEARINGS RELATED TO 04 FEDERAL REALIGNMENTS AND CLOSURES OF MILITARY BASES IN THE 05 STATE AND PROVIDE TESTIMONY AS NECESSARY; 06 (5) REVIEW THE EFFECT ON THE STATE AND ITS 07 COMMUNITIES OF FEDERAL REALIGNMENTS AND CLOSURES OF 08 MILITARY BASES IN THE STATE; 09 (6)] monitor the development of the national ballistic missile defense 10 system and work with the congressional delegation of the state, other state and local 11 government organizations, and community groups to advocate and expedite the 12 deployment of the system in this state; 13 (4) [(7)] investigate opportunities to increase joint and combined 14 military training in the state; 15 (5) [(8)] advocate the stationing of reconfigured power projection 16 forces at bases located in the state; and 17 (6) support the state's central role in military defense; 18 (7) review and recommend state policy responses to national 19 defense initiatives and Arctic security initiatives; in this paragraph, 20 (A) "Arctic security initiatives" means using the state as a 21 strategic base for defense operations, infrastructure development, 22 environmental protection, the management of emerging risks such as 23 increased shipping, climate change, and international competition, and 24 other actions and policies focused on protecting national interests in the 25 Arctic; 26 (B) "national defense initiatives" means base expansion, 27 enhancing surveillance and early warning systems, improving Arctic- 28 capable forces, ensuring rapid response to threats in the Arctic and 29 northern approaches, and other planned actions and programs carried 30 out in the state to strengthen national military readiness and security; 31 (8) convene hearings and stakeholder consultations on emerging 01 defense issues; 02 (9) prepare and submit a report of its activities to the legislature by 03 December 31 of the year [ON THE FIRST DAY] of each second regular session. 04 * Sec. 7. AS 44.19.863 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 44.19.863. Duties of the commission. The commission shall 06 (1) provide advice, counsel, and actionable recommendations on 07 military issues, and economic and industrial development related to military issues, to 08 the governor, state agencies, the legislature, communities, and the state's congressional 09 delegation; 10 (2) provide recommendations to expand and grow the current presence 11 of the armed forces in the state, including new bases, expanded missions, and 12 increased training; 13 (3) plan for state infrastructure needs to support military objectives; 14 (4) recommend methods to improve private and public employment 15 opportunities for the families of current and former members of the military who 16 reside in the state; 17 (5) assist and advise communities and the state in the design and 18 execution of programs that enhance communities' relationships with installations of 19 the armed forces of the United States and defense-related businesses, including in the 20 areas of public school education, in-state higher education and training, cultural and 21 recreational community assets, and housing and energy affordability; 22 (6) advocate for the state in matters related to military expansion 23 decision making by emphasizing the state's strategic location on the globe and existing 24 infrastructure and work to build community support in the state for the armed forces of 25 the United States; 26 (7) prepare and maintain a strategic plan to 27 (A) protect the state's existing military missions; 28 (B) position the state to be competitive for new and expanded 29 military missions; 30 (C) promote the long-term viability and prosperity of the 31 military and industries related to national defense in the state; and 01 (D) consider all current and anticipated base realignment and 02 closure criteria affecting bases in the state; 03 (8) report to [THE JOINT ARMED SERVICES COMMITTEE AND] 04 any special committee of the legislature relating to military and veterans' affairs, if one 05 exists at the time the report is due, issues on the commission's activities over the 06 previous calendar year; the commission shall provide the report in an electronic format 07 and deliver the report by January 31 each year; 08 (9) seek the opinions of each member of the Alaska delegation in 09 Congress on the assistance, advice, advocacy, counsel, plans, and recommendations 10 provided under this section. 11 * Sec. 8. AS 24.20.650, 24.20.655, 24.20.660, 24.20.665, 24.20.670, 24.20.675; and 12 AS 26.05.342(d) are repealed. 13 * Sec. 9. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 14 read: 15 JOINT ARMED SERVICES COMMITTEE; TERMINATION AND 16 APPOINTMENT. (a) The terms of the current members of the Joint Armed Services 17 Committee are terminated on the effective date of sec. 2 of this Act. 18 (b) Current members of the Joint Armed Services Committee may be reappointed. 19 (c) The appointing authorities under AS 24.20.650(b) shall appoint members to the 20 Joint Armed Services Committee under AS 24.20.650(b), as amended by sec. 2 of this Act, 21 within 45 days after the effective date of sec. 2 of this Act. 22 * Sec. 10. Sections 1, 7, and 8 of this Act take effect June 30, 2036. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.